Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 6. Division of Securities Counsel.

§ 13.1-527.1.
Division created; duties.

There is hereby created in the office of the Attorney General a Division of Securities Counsel.

The duties of such Division shall be to provide legal and technical assistance to an attorney for the Commonwealth, in the preparation for a prosecution of and the prosecution of a violation of this title; provided, however, such assistance shall be rendered only upon the request of the attorney for the Commonwealth.

History.

1974, c. 253.

§ 13.1-527.2.
Attorneys, employees and consultants.

The Attorney General may employ and fix the salaries of such attorneys, employees and consultants, within the amounts appropriated to the Attorney General for providing legal service for the Commonwealth, as he may deem necessary for the operation of the Division of Securities Counsel to carry out its functions.

History.

1974, c. 253.

§ 13.1-527.3.
Commission to provide technical assistance.

The State Corporation Commission shall provide technical assistance to the Division of Securities Counsel in its investigation and preparation of a prosecution under the provisions of this title.

History.

1974, c. 253.